Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-529.04
Flood control projects; removal to another site; when authorized.

Whenever the United States Government acquires by purchase or under eminent domain the entire site upon which a city of the second class or a village is located under any flood control project, such city or village may be removed to another site and retain its corporate identity by observing the procedure set out in sections 17-529.05 and 17-529.06.

Laws 1947, c. 44, § 2, p. 160.